Maine, session 132, LD291.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1811, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H, §23
and c. 673, §22 and affected by c. 643, Pt. H, §29 and c. 673, §28, is further amended by
amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) Nine percent on the value of rental of living quarters in any a hotel, or rooming
house or, except for those in a tourist or trailer camp;
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to sales occurring on or after January 1, 2026.